Utah statutes.
51-7-18.2.   Public treasurer's reports -- Contents.

(1)  The council may:

(a)  require any public treasurer to prepare and file with it a written report in a form prescribed by the council containing the information required by this section; and

(b)  specify that the report will contain the information required by this section for any date.

(2)  The council shall require the report to include information:

(a)  specifying the amount of public funds in the public treasurer's possession or control;

(b)  detailing the nature and extent of the deposit and investment of those funds;

(c)  detailing the rate of return on each deposit or investment; and

(d)  detailing the nature and extent of interest rate contracts authorized by Subsection 51-7-17(2).

(3)  The public treasurer shall file the report with the council within 10 days after he receives the council's request.

(4)  Each public treasurer shall make copies of any reports required by this section available for inspection by the public at his office during normal business hours.



Amended by Chapter 285, 1992 General Session

